Nebraska, session 109, LB1197.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 37-455, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
37-455 (1) The commission may issue a limited permit for deer,
antelope, wild turkey, or elk to a person who is a qualifying landowner
or leaseholder or a member of such person's immediate family as described
in this section. The commission may issue nonresident landowner limited
permits after preference has been given for the issuance of resident
permits as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the commission. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a
permit shall be valid during the predetermined period established by the
commission pursuant to sections 37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or
37-457. Upon receipt of an application in proper form as prescribed by
the rules and regulations of the commission, the commission may issue (a)
a limited deer, antelope, or wild turkey permit valid for hunting on all
of the land which is owned or leased by the qualifying landowner or
leaseholder if such lands are identified in the application or (b) a
limited elk permit valid for hunting on the entire elk management unit of
which the land of the qualifying landowner or leaseholder included in the
application is a part.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations prescribing procedures and forms and create requirements for
documentation by an applicant or permittee (i) to determine whether the
applicant or permittee is a Nebraska resident and is a qualifying
landowner or leaseholder of the described property or is a member of the
immediate family of such qualifying landowner or leaseholder and (ii) to
allow a Nebraska resident landowner to transfer a permit to a designee of
the landowner for a fee equal to the fee for the original permit. The
commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that create
requirements for documentation to designate one qualifying landowner
among partners of a partnership or officers or shareholders of a
corporation that owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch
-2-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
land for agricultural purposes and among beneficiaries of a trust that
owns or leases eighty acres or more of farm or ranch land for
agricultural purposes as qualifying landowners. Only a person who is a
qualifying landowner or leaseholder or a member of such person's
immediate family may apply for a limited permit. An applicant may apply
for no more than one permit per species per year except as otherwise
provided in subsection (4) of this section and the rules and regulations
of the commission. For purposes of this section, member of a person's
immediate family means and is limited to the spouse of such person, any
child or stepchild of such person or of the spouse of such person, any
spouse of any such child or stepchild, any grandchild or stepgrandchild
of such person or of the spouse of such person, any spouse of such
grandchild or stepgrandchild, any sibling of such person sharing
ownership in the property, and any spouse of any such sibling.
(b) The conditions applicable to permits issued pursuant to sections
37-447 to 37-450, 37-452, 37-456, or 37-457, whichever is appropriate,
shall apply to limited permits issued pursuant to this section, except
that the commission may pass commission orders for species harvest
allocation pertaining to the sex and age of the species harvested which
are different for a limited permit than for other hunting permits. For
purposes of this section, white-tailed deer and mule deer shall be
treated as one species.
(3)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is a the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary of designated as the qualifying landowner by
a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of a the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per species for each farm
-3-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided
by eighty. The fee for a limited permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be
one-half the fee for the regular permit for such species.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited deer or antelope permit. The number of limited permits issued
annually per species for each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total
acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three hundred twenty. The fee for
such a permit to hunt deer or antelope shall be one-half the fee for a
nonresident permit to hunt such species.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
providing for the issuance of an additional limited deer permit to a
qualified individual for the taking of a deer without antlers at a fee
equal to or less than the fee for the original limited permit.
(4)(a) In addition to any limited permit to hunt deer issued to a
qualifying landowner under subsection (3) of this section, the commission
shall issue up to eight limited permits to hunt deer during the three
days of Saturday through Monday immediately preceding the opening day of
firearm deer hunting season to any qualifying landowner meeting the
requirements of subdivision (b) of this subsection and designated members
of his or her immediate family. The fee for each permit issued under this
subsection shall be five dollars. Permits shall be issued subject to the
following:
(i) No more than eight permits may be issued per qualifying
landowner to the landowner or designated members of his or her immediate
family, except that no more than one permit shall be issued per person
for the qualifying landowner or any designated member of his or her
immediate family;
(ii) Of the eight permits that may be issued, no more than six
permits may be issued to persons who are younger than nineteen years of
-4-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
age and no more than two permits may be issued to persons who are
nineteen years of age or older; and
(iii) For a Nebraska resident landowner, the number of permits
issued shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty, and for a nonresident landowner, the number of permits issued
shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by three
hundred twenty.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the qualifying criteria for a
Nebraska resident described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this
section and the ownership criteria for a nonresident of Nebraska
described in subdivision (3)(b) of this section apply.
(c) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
(5)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey, the
applicant shall be a Nebraska resident who (i) owns or leases eighty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or a member
of such person's immediate family or (ii) is a the partner, officer,
shareholder, or beneficiary of designated as the qualifying landowner by
a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and
regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section or a member of the
immediate family of a the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary.
The number of limited permits issued annually per season for each farm or
ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or ranch divided by
eighty. An applicant may apply for no more than one limited permit per
season. The fee for a limited permit to hunt wild turkey shall be one-
half the fee for the regular permit to hunt wild turkey.
(b) A nonresident of Nebraska who owns three hundred twenty acres or
more of farm or ranch land in the State of Nebraska for agricultural
purposes or a member of such person's immediate family may apply for a
limited permit to hunt wild turkey. Only one limited wild turkey permit
per three hundred twenty acres may be issued annually for each wild
-5-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
turkey season under this subdivision. The fee for such a permit to hunt
shall be one-half the fee for a nonresident permit to hunt wild turkey.
(6)(a) To qualify for a limited permit to hunt elk, (i) the
applicant shall be (A) a Nebraska resident who owns three hundred twenty
acres or more of farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes, or is a
the partner, officer, shareholder, or beneficiary of designated as the
qualifying landowner by a partnership, corporation, or trust as provided
in the rules and regulations under subdivision (2)(a) of this section,
(B) a Nebraska resident who leases six hundred forty acres or more of
farm or ranch land for agricultural purposes or has a combined total of
six hundred forty leased and owned acres of farm or ranch land used for
agricultural purposes, or is a the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary of designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, (C) a nonresident of Nebraska who
owns at least one thousand two hundred eighty acres of farm or ranch land
for agricultural purposes, or is a the partner, officer, shareholder, or
beneficiary of designated as the qualifying landowner by a partnership,
corporation, or trust as provided in the rules and regulations under
subdivision (2)(a) of this section, or (D) a member of such owner's or
lessee's immediate family and (ii) the qualifying farm or ranch land of
the applicant shall be within an area designated as an elk management
zone by the commission in its rules and regulations.
(b) An applicant shall not be issued a limited bull elk permit more
than once every three years, and the commission may give preference to a
person who did not receive a limited elk permit or a specified type of
limited elk permit during the previous years.
(c) The fee for a resident landowner limited permit to hunt elk
shall not exceed one-half the fee for the regular permit to hunt elk. The
fee for a nonresident landowner limited permit to hunt elk shall not
exceed three times the cost of a resident elk permit.
-6-

LB1197 LB1197
2026 2026
(d) The number of applications allowed for limited elk permits for
each farm or ranch shall not exceed the total acreage of the farm or
ranch divided by the minimum acreage requirements established for the
property. No more than one person may qualify for the same described
property.
Sec. 2. Original section 37-455, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-7-